Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5632.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and declaration of purpose. The general assembly hereby
finds and declares that:
(1) Containing health care costs requires containing prescription drug costs. The costs of
prescription drugs have been increasing dramatically. To contain prescription drug costs, it is
essential to understand the drivers of those costs, including increases in prescriptions and changes
in prescription patterns from low-cost to high-cost drugs.
(2) Drug companies employ pharmaceutical sales representatives to increase sales by
persuading prescribers to prescribe certain drugs. Sales representatives may provide education to
the prescriber, but often also include inducements in the form of gifts and drug samples.
(3) Drug sales representatives often have access to physician prescription tracking data.
(4) The state has an interest in requiring disclosures and regulating the practice of drug
sales representatives.
SECTION 2. Title 5 of the General Laws entitled "BUSINESSES AND PROFESSIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.3
THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG SALES REPRESENTATIVE DISCLOSURE ACT
5-19.3-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Prescription Drug Sales

Representative Disclosure Act".
5-19.3-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the department of business regulation.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of business regulation, or designee.
(3) "Manufacturer" means a pharmaceutical, biological product, or medical device
manufacturer or any other person who is engaged in the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, processing, marketing, or packaging of prescribed products. The term does not
include a wholesale distributor, a retailer, or a pharmacist. The term also does not include a
manufacturer whose only prescribed products are classified as Class I by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration, are exempt from pre-market notification under Section 510(k) of the federal Food,
Drug and Cosmetic Act, and are sold over-the-counter without a prescription.
(4) "Medical facility" means any freestanding emergency care facility, healthcare facility,
physician or podiatry ambulatory-surgery center, or other similar entity licensed by the state.
(5) "Pharmaceutical sales representative" means a person who markets prescription drugs
to providers of health care licensed, certified or registered in this state, pharmacies or employees
thereof, operators or employees of medical facilities or persons licensed or certified by the state.
(6) "Prescription drug" means a drug as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321.
(7) "Provider of health care" means any person licensed in this state to administer or
prescribe a prescription drug.
5-19.3-3. Pharmaceutical manufacturer and sales representative registration,
disclosure, and transparency report.
(a) A manufacturer of a prescription drug shall provide to the department a list of each
pharmaceutical sales representative who markets prescription drugs on behalf of the manufacturer
to providers of health care in this state, pharmacies or employees thereof, or operators or employees
of medical facilities or persons licensed in this state.
(1) The manufacturer shall inform the department by any means acceptable to the
department of a change in the manufacturer's list within sixty (60) days of the change. Failure to
timely inform the department of a change may result in a penalty to be determined by the
department.
(2) The manufacturer shall refile or update the list annually.
(b) The department shall provide electronic access to the most recent list provided by each
manufacturer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to each provider of health care licensed,
certified or registered in this state, operator of a pharmacy, and operator of a medical facility, or
LC001930 - Page 2 of 5

person licensed or certified under the provisions of title 5 for the purposes of ensuring compliance
with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section. The department shall also provide electronic
access to the information to the department of health and public access via the department's website.
This subsection shall not be construed to impose any duty on a provider of health care, operator of
a pharmacy, or operator of a medical facility or person licensed or certified under the provisions of
title 5 to ensure such compliance.
(c) A person who is not included on a current list submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section, shall not market prescription drugs on behalf of a manufacturer to any provider of
health care licensed, certified or registered in this state, pharmacy or employee thereof, operator or
employee of a medical facility or person licensed or certified under the provisions of title 5.
(d) On or before March 1 of each year, each person who was included on a list of
pharmaceutical sales representatives submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, at any
time during the immediately preceding calendar year shall submit to the department a report, which
shall include, for the immediately preceding calendar year:
(1) A list of providers of health care, pharmacies and employees thereof, and operators and
employees of medical facilities and persons licensed or certified under the provisions of title 5 to
whom the pharmaceutical sales representative provided:
(i) Any type of compensation, gift, or thing of value, with a value that exceeds one hundred
dollars ($100); or
(ii) Total compensation, gift, or thing of value, with a value that exceeds two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) in the aggregate; and
(2) The name and manufacturer of each prescription drug for which the pharmaceutical
sales representative provided a free sample to a provider of health care licensed, certified or
registered in this state, pharmacy or employee thereof, or operator or employee of a medical facility
or person licensed or certified under the provisions of title 5.
(e) The department shall analyze annually the information submitted pursuant to subsection
(d) of this section, and compile a report on the activities of pharmaceutical sales representatives in
this state. On or before June 1 of each year, the department shall:
(1) Post the report on the website maintained by the department; and
(2) Submit the report to the governor, the director of the department of health, the
commissioner of the office of health insurance, and to the speaker of the house and the senate
president.
5-19.3-4. Fees and penalties.
(a) A fee in the amount of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) annually shall be charged by the
LC001930 - Page 3 of 5

director from each manufacturer, per each pharmaceutical sales representative listed by the
manufacturer. All revenue collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited as restricted receipts
available to the department as described in § 42-14-9.
(b) The attorney general may bring an action in superior court, Providence county for
injunctive relief, costs, and attorneys' fees, and to impose on a manufacturer that fails to provide
the information required by this chapter a civil penalty of no more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per violation. Each unlawful failure to provide information shall constitute a separate
violation. In any action brought pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall have the same
authority to investigate and to obtain remedies as if the action were brought under chapter 13.1 of
title 6 ("deceptive trade practices").
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001930
========
LC001930 - Page 4 of 5